North Dakota, session 69, SB2273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 14 of section 43-26.1-01 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
14. "Practice of physical therapy" means:
a. Examining, evaluating, and testing individuals with mechanical, physiological, and
developmental impairments, functional limitations in movement and mobility, and
disabilities or other health and movement-related conditions to determine a diagnosis for
physical therapy, prognosis, and plan of therapeutic intervention, and to assess the
ongoing effects of intervention. The term includes ordering musculoskeletaldiagnostic
imaging consisting of plain film radiographs to be performed by a professional authorized
by chapter 43-62 and interpreted by a licensed physician trained in radiology
interpretation, and using these results to determine if a referral to another health care
provider is necessary or indicates the necessary treatment is within the physical
therapist's scope of practice.
b. Alleviating impairments, functional limitations in movement and mobility, and disabilities
by designing, implementing and modifying therapeutic interventions that may include
therapeutic exercise; neuromuscular education; functional training related to positioning,
movement, and mobility in self-care and in-home, community, or work integration or
reintegration; manual therapy; therapeutic massage; prescription, application and, as
appropriate, fabrication of assistive, adaptive, orthotic, prosthetic, protective, and
supportive devices and equipment related to positioning, movement, and mobility; airway
clearance techniques; integumentary protection and repair techniques; debridement and
wound care; physiotherapy; physical agents or modalities; mechanical and
electrotherapeutic modalities; and patient-related instruction.
c. Engaging as a physical therapist in reducing the risk of injury, impairment, functional
limitation and disability, including the promotion and maintenance of fitness, health, and
wellness in populations of all ages.
d. Engaging as a physical therapist in administration, consultation, education, and research.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 43-26.1-11.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
43-26.1-11.1. Ordering imaging.
1. A physical therapist may order musculoskeletaldiagnostic imaging consisting of plain film
radiographs if the physical therapist holds:
a. Holds a clinical doctorate degree in physical therapy; or has completed
b. Completed a board-approved formal medical imaging training program.

S. B. NO. 2273 - PAGE 2
2. A physical therapist ordering diagnostic imaging shall report the results to the patient's
designated specialty or primary care provider within seven days of receipt of the image to
ensure coordination of care, unless:
a. The patient does not have a specialty or primary care provider; or
b. The specialty or primary care provider received the images from the health care
professional who performed or interpreted the images.

S. B. NO. 2273 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2273.
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 1 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State